fi: Ohjelmistotyökalutyyppi: Rakennustyökalu; Käännösohjelma; Virheenjäljitin; GUI-suunnittelija; Linkitin; Lähdekoodieditori; Versionhallintajärjestelmä; Muu
ru: Тип программного средства: Инструмент сборки; Компилятор; Отладчик; Дизайнер графического интерфейса; Компоновщик; Редактор исходного кода; Система контроля версий; Другое
de: Typ des Softwaretools: Build-Tool; Compiler; Debugger; GUI-Designer; Linker; Quellcode-Editor; Versionsverwaltungssystem; Sonstiges
ja: ソフトウェアツールの種類: ビルドツール; コンパイラ; デバッガー; GUIデザイナー; リンカー; ソースコードエディタ; バージョン管理システム; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta programskega orodja: Orodje za gradnjo; Prevajalnik; Odpravljalnik napak; Oblikovalec GUI; Povezovalnik; Urejevalnik izvorne kode; Sistem za nadzor različic; Drugo
it: Tipo di strumento software: Strumento edile; Compilatore; Debugger; Progettista della GUI; Linker; Editor del codice sorgente; Sistema di controllo della versione; Altro
nl: Type softwaretool: Bouwtool; Compiler; Debugger; GUI-ontwerper; Linker; Broncode-editor; Versiebeheersysteem; Andere
ro-RO: Tip de instrument software: Build tool; Compilator; Instrument de depanare; Designer GUI; Linker; Editor de cod sursă; Sistem de control al versiunilor; Altele
nb: Programvareverktøytype: Byggverktøy; Kompilator; Debugger; GUI-designer; Linker; Kildekoderedigering; Versjonskontrollsystem; Annet
th: ประเภทเครื่องมือซอฟต์แวร์: เครื่องมือสร้าง; คอมไพเลอร์; ดีบักเกอร์; ซอฟต์แวร์ออกแบบ GUI; ลิงค์เกอร์; ตัวแก้ไขซอร์สโค้ด; ระบบควบคุมเวอร์ชัน; อื่นๆ
ko: 소프트웨어 도구 유형: 빌드 도구; 컴파일러; 디버거; GUI 디자이너; 링커; 소스 코드 편집기; 버전 관리 시스템; 기타
pl: Typ narzędzia programowego: Narzędzie do budowania; Kompilator; Debuger; Projektant GUI; Linker; Edytor kodu źródłowego; System kontroli wersji; Inne
vi: Loại công cụ phần mềm: Công cụ xây dựng; Trình biên dịch; Trình gỡ lỗi; Trình thiết kế giao diện người dùng dạng đồ họa; Trình liên kết; Trình soạn thảo mã nguồn; Hệ thống kiểm soát phiên bản; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de ferramenta de software: Ferramenta de construção; Compilador; Depurador; Designer de GUI; Vinculador; Editor de código-fonte; Sistema de controle de versão; Outro
da: Softwareværktøjstype: Byggeværktøjer; Compiler; Debugger; GUI-designer; Linker; Kildekode-editor; Versionskontrolsystem; Andet
zh-CN: 软件工具类型: 构建工具; 编译器; 调试器; GUI 设计器; 链接器; 源代码编辑器; 版本控制系统; 其他
en: Software tool type: Build tool; Compiler; Debugger; GUI designer; Linker; Source code editor; Version control system; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta de software: Ferramenta de compilação; Compilador; Depurador; Designer de GUI; Linker; Editor de código-fonte; Sistema de controlo de versão; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta softverskog alata: Alat za izradu; Kompilator; Debugger; GUI designer; Povezivač; Uređivač izvornog koda; Sustav kontrole verzija; Ostalo
tr: Yazılım aracı türü: Oluşturma araçları; Derleyici; Hata ayıklayıcı; Grafik arayüz tasarlayıcı; Bağlayıcı; Kaynak kodu düzenleyicisi; Sürüm kontrol sistemi; Diğer
el: Τύπος εργαλείου λογισμικού: Εργαλείο κατασκευής; Μεταγλωττιστής; Εντοπιστής σφαλμάτων; Σχεδιαστής GUI; Σύνδεσμος; Επεξεργαστής πηγαίου κώδικα; Σύστημα ελέγχου έκδοσης; Άλλο
hu: Szoftverfejlesztési eszköz típusa: Építőeszköz; Fordítóprogram; Hibakereső; GUI tervező; Linker; Forráskódszerkesztő; Verzióvezérlő rendszer; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип софтуерен инструмент: Инструмент за изграждане; Компилатор; Дебъгер; GUI дизайнер; Свързващ модул; Редактор на изходния код; Система за контрол на версиите; Други
es: Tipo de herramienta de software: Herramientas de desarrollo; Compilador; Depurador; Diseñador de GUI; Enlazador; Editor de código fuente; Sistema de control de versiones; Otros
cs: Typ softwarového nástroje: Nástroj pro sestavování; Kompilátor; Ladicí program; Nástroj pro návrh GUI; Linker; Editor zdrojového kódu; Systém pro řízení verzí; Jiné
lt-LT: Programinės įrangos įrankio tipas: Kūrimo įrankis; Kompiliatorius; Derintuvas; GUI dizaineris; Saistyklė; Šaltinio kodo redaktorius; Versijų valdymo sistema; Kita
sk-SK: Typ softvérového nástroja: Nástroj na zostavenie; Kompilátor; Debugger; Dizajnér GUI; Prepojovací modul; Editor zdrojového kódu; Systém kontroly verzií; Iné
fr: Type d’outil logiciel: Outil de construction; Compilateur; Débogueur; Concepteur d’interface graphique; Éditeur de liens; Éditeur de code source; Systèmes de contrôle de versions; Autre
sv: Typ av programvaruverktyg: Byggverktyg; Kompilator; Avlusare; GUI-designer; Länkare; Källkodseditor; Versionshanteringssystem; Övrigt
zh-TW: 軟體工具類型: 建構工具; 編譯器; 偵錯器; 圖形使用者介面構建器; 鏈結器; 原始碼編輯器; 版本控制系統; 其他